North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-02.1 Health Statistics Act
23-02.1-18.
New birth records following adoption, legitimation, and paternity determination.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state registrar shall establish a new birth record for a person born in this state when the registrar receives the following:

An adoption report as provided in section 23-02.1-17 or a certified copy of the decree of adoption together with the information necessary to identify the original birth record and to establish a new birth record; except that a new birth record may not be established if so requested by the court decreeing the adoption, the adoptive parents, or the adoptive person.

A request that a new record be established and such evidence as required by rules and regulations proving that such person has been legitimated or that a court of competent jurisdiction has determined the paternity of such person.

For a person born in a foreign country whose adoptive parents are residents of the state of North Dakota at the time of the adoption, the state registrar shall prepare a new birth record:

In the case of a foreign-born person adopted in North Dakota, upon presentation of a report of adoption as required by section 23-02.1-17.

In the case of a foreign-born person adopted outside the state of North Dakota or outside the United States, or in the state of North Dakota prior to July 1, 1979, upon presentation of a certified copy of the adoption decree, and:

A certified copy of the birth record of the adopted person; or

An affidavit of an adoptive parent setting forth the true or probable date and place of birth and parentage of the adopted person.

When a new birth record is established, the actual place and date of birth must be shown. The new birth record must be substituted for the original birth record:

Thereafter, the original birth record and the evidence of adoption, paternity, or legitimation is not subject to inspection except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction or as provided by rules and regulations.

Upon receipt of a notice of annulment of adoption, the original birth record must be restored to its place in the files and the new birth record and evidence is not subject to inspection except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

If no birth record is on file for the person for whom a new birth record is to be established under this section, an original birth record must be filed with the state registrar in accordance with the appropriate rules and regulations promulgated by the state department of health. The new record is also to be prepared on the standard forms in use at the time of the adoption, legitimation, or paternity determination.

When a new birth record is established by the state registrar, all copies of the original birth record in the custody of any custodian of permanent local records in the state must be sealed from inspection or forwarded to the state registrar, as the registrar directs.

Any certification of a birth record issued under this subsection must be in the same form as other certifications of birth records issued in this state except that it must state that it does not purport to be evidence of United States citizenship.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 18; 1979, ch. 202, § 3; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 12.

Cross-References.

Application for new birth record after adoption, see N.D.C.C. § 14-15-18.

23-02.1-18.
New birth records following adoption, legitimation, and paternity determination.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The state registrar shall establish a new birth record for a person born in this state when the registrar receives the following:

An adoption report as provided in section 23-02.1-17 or a certified copy of the decree of adoption together with the information necessary to identify the original birth record and to establish a new birth record; except that a new birth record may not be established if so requested by the court decreeing the adoption, the adoptive parents, or the adoptive person.

A request that a new record be established and such evidence as required by rules and regulations proving that such person has been legitimated or that a court of competent jurisdiction has determined the paternity of such person.

For a person born in a foreign country whose adoptive parents are residents of the state of North Dakota at the time of the adoption, the state registrar shall prepare a new birth record:

In the case of a foreign-born person adopted in North Dakota, upon presentation of a report of adoption as required by section 23-02.1-17.

In the case of a foreign-born person adopted outside the state of North Dakota or outside the United States, or in the state of North Dakota prior to July 1, 1979, upon presentation of a certified copy of the adoption decree, and:

A certified copy of the birth record of the adopted person; or

An affidavit of an adoptive parent setting forth the true or probable date and place of birth and parentage of the adopted person.

When a new birth record is established, the actual place and date of birth must be shown. The new birth record must be substituted for the original birth record:

Thereafter, the original birth record and the evidence of adoption, paternity, or legitimation is not subject to inspection except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction or as provided by rules and regulations.

Upon receipt of a notice of annulment of adoption, the original birth record must be restored to its place in the files and the new birth record and evidence is not subject to inspection except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

If no birth record is on file for the person for whom a new birth record is to be established under this section, an original birth record must be filed with the state registrar in accordance with the appropriate rules and regulations promulgated by the department of health and human services. The new record is also to be prepared on the standard forms in use at the time of the adoption, legitimation, or paternity determination.

When a new birth record is established by the state registrar, all copies of the original birth record in the custody of any custodian of permanent local records in the state must be sealed from inspection or forwarded to the state registrar, as the registrar directs.

Any certification of a birth record issued under this subsection must be in the same form as other certifications of birth records issued in this state except that it must state that it does not purport to be evidence of United States citizenship.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 18; 1979, ch. 202, § 3; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 12; 2021, ch. 352, § 151, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-19.
Death registration.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

A death record for each death that occurs in this state must be filed with the state registrar in accordance with the rules and regulations set forth by the state department of health using the electronic death registration system. All registration and issuing of copies of death records will be completed by the state department of health.

The funeral director shall obtain the facts of death from the next of kin or the best qualified individual or source available and must file the facts of death information using the electronic death registration system within three days after assuming custody of the dead body. The funeral director shall obtain the medical certification of death from the individual responsible for the medical certification.

The medical certification must be completed and filed using the electronic death registration system within ten days after death by the physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner in charge of the patient’s care for the illness or condition which resulted in death except when inquiry is required by the local health officer or coroner.

When death occurred without medical attendance or when inquiry is required by the local health officer or coroner, the county coroner shall investigate the cause of death, and shall obtain medical information about the individual from the individual’s medical records or last-known physician or physician assistant, and shall complete and file the medical certification within ten days after taking charge of the case using the electronic death registration system.

If the cause of death cannot be determined within ten days after death, the medical certification may be filed after the prescribed period, in accordance with rules adopted by the state department of health. The attending physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, or coroner shall give the funeral director in custody of the body notice of the reason for the delay and final disposition may not be made until authorized by the attending physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, or coroner.

When a death is presumed to have occurred within this state but the body cannot be located, a death record may be prepared by the state registrar upon receipt of findings of a court of competent jurisdiction, including the facts of death and medical certification required to complete the death record. The death record must be marked “presumptive” and must show on the face of the death record the date of registration and must identify the court and the date of the decree.

Each death registration must include the social security number of the decedent, if the information is available. A social security number included on a death record is confidential and may be disclosed only to a relative or authorized representative of the individual named on the record, to a person with personal or real property interests that depend upon information contained in the death record, or by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 19; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 404, § 45; 2001, ch. 232, § 5; 2003, ch. 209, § 1; 2003, ch. 382, § 3; 2007, ch. 234, § 13; 2011, ch. 184, § 1; 2015, ch. 188, § 4, effective August 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Finding of death and other facts under Federal Missing Persons Act prima facie evidence, see N.D.C.C. §§ 31-11-04.1, 31-11-04.2.

Fireproof vaults for storage of birth and death certificates, see N.D.C.C. § 23-01-10.

23-02.1-19.
Death registration.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

A death record for each death that occurs in this state must be filed with the state registrar in accordance with the rules and regulations set forth by the department of health and human services using the electronic death registration system. All registration and issuing of copies of death records will be completed by the department of health and human services.

The funeral director shall obtain the facts of death from the next of kin or the best qualified individual or source available and must file the facts of death information using the electronic death registration system within three days after assuming custody of the dead body. The funeral director shall obtain the medical certification of death from the individual responsible for the medical certification.

The medical certification must be completed and filed using the electronic death registration system within ten days after death by the physician, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner in charge of the patient’s care for the illness or condition which resulted in death except when inquiry is required by the local health officer or coroner.

When death occurred without medical attendance or when inquiry is required by the local health officer or coroner, the county coroner shall investigate the cause of death, and shall obtain medical information about the individual from the individual’s medical records or last-known physician or physician assistant, and shall complete and file the medical certification within ten days after taking charge of the case using the electronic death registration system.

If the cause of death cannot be determined within ten days after death, the medical certification may be filed after the prescribed period, in accordance with rules adopted by the department of health and human services. The attending physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, or coroner shall give the funeral director in custody of the body notice of the reason for the delay and final disposition may not be made until authorized by the attending physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, or coroner.

When a death is presumed to have occurred within this state but the body cannot be located, a death record may be prepared by the state registrar upon receipt of findings of a court of competent jurisdiction, including the facts of death and medical certification required to complete the death record. The death record must be marked “presumptive” and must show on the face of the death record the date of registration and must identify the court and the date of the decree.

Each death registration must include the social security number of the decedent, if the information is available. A social security number included on a death record is confidential and may be disclosed only to a relative or authorized representative of the individual named on the record, to a person with personal or real property interests that depend upon information contained in the death record, or by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 19; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 404, § 45; 2001, ch. 232, § 5; 2003, ch. 209, § 1; 2003, ch. 382, § 3; 2007, ch. 234, § 13; 2011, ch. 184, § 1; 2015, ch. 188, § 4, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 152, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-20.
Fetal death registration.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

A fetal death record for each fetal death that occurs in this state after a gestation period of twenty completed weeks or more must be filed with the state registrar.

When a fetal death occurs in an institution, the person in charge of the institution or a designated representative shall use the state department of health’s electronic fetal death registration system to report the fetal death, including all personal and medical facts, to the state registrar within ten days after the delivery. If a fetal death occurs outside of an institution, a funeral director or other individual in attendance at or after delivery shall file the fetal death record.

When inquiry is required by the local health officer or coroner or in the absence of medical attendance, the county coroner shall investigate the cause of fetal death, and shall obtain medical information about the individual from that individual’s medical records or last-known physician or physician assistant and file the medical certification within ten days after taking charge of the case using the electronic death registration system.

If the cause of fetal death cannot be determined within ten days after death, the medical certification may be filed after the prescribed period of time in accordance with rules adopted by the state department of health. The attending physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, or coroner shall give the funeral director in custody of the fetus the notice of the reason for the delay and final disposition may not be made until authorized by the attending physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, or coroner.

The provision for entering the name of the father of the fetus on the fetal death record and the reporting of out-of-wedlock fetal deaths concur exactly with those set forth in section 23-02.1-13.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 20; 1995, ch. 54, § 15; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2001, ch. 232, § 6; 2003, ch. 209, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 14; 2011, ch. 184, § 2; 2015, ch. 188, § 5, effective August 1, 2015.

23-02.1-20.
Fetal death registration.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

A fetal death record for each fetal death that occurs in this state after a gestation period of twenty completed weeks or more must be filed with the state registrar.

When a fetal death occurs in an institution, the person in charge of the institution or a designated representative shall use the department of health and human services’ electronic fetal death registration system to report the fetal death, including all personal and medical facts, to the state registrar within ten days after the delivery. If a fetal death occurs outside of an institution, a funeral director or other individual in attendance at or after delivery shall file the fetal death record.

When inquiry is required by the local health officer or coroner or in the absence of medical attendance, the county coroner shall investigate the cause of fetal death, and shall obtain medical information about the individual from that individual’s medical records or last-known physician or physician assistant and file the medical certification within ten days after taking charge of the case using the electronic death registration system.

If the cause of fetal death cannot be determined within ten days after death, the medical certification may be filed after the prescribed period of time in accordance with rules adopted by the department of health and human services. The attending physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, or coroner shall give the funeral director in custody of the fetus the notice of the reason for the delay and final disposition may not be made until authorized by the attending physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, or coroner.

The provision for entering the name of the father of the fetus on the fetal death record and the reporting of out-of-wedlock fetal deaths concur exactly with those set forth in section 23-02.1-13.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 20; 1995, ch. 54, § 15; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2001, ch. 232, § 6; 2003, ch. 209, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 14; 2011, ch. 184, § 2; 2015, ch. 188, § 5, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 153, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-20.1.
Fetal loss.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state registrar may issue a certified copy of a fetal loss to an individual who experiences a documented miscarriage of birth, if the individual provides to the state registrar a completed fetal loss request form established by the state department of health which is signed by the mother or the father and a letter signed by a hospital, physician, or other medical attendant documenting proof of pregnancy and fetal loss.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 187, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

23-02.1-20.1.
Fetal loss.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The state registrar may issue a certified copy of a fetal loss to an individual who experiences a documented miscarriage of birth, if the individual provides to the state registrar a completed fetal loss request form established by the department of health and human services which is signed by the mother or the father and a letter signed by a hospital, physician, or other medical attendant documenting proof of pregnancy and fetal loss.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 187, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 154, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-21.
Permits.

The funeral practitioner who first obtains custody of a dead body or fetus shall obtain a final disposition-transit permit before final disposition or removal from this state of the body or fetus.

The final disposition-transit permits must be issued by the state registrar or a subregistrar and must be filed in the office of the county recorder where the final disposition occurs in accordance with the requirements of sections 23-02.1-19 and 23-02.1-20.

A final disposition-transit permit issued under the laws of another state which accompanies a dead body or fetus brought into this state is authority for final disposition of the body or fetus in this state.

A permit for disinterment and reinterment is required before disinterment of a dead body or fetus except as authorized by rules or otherwise provided by law. The permit must be issued by the state registrar to a funeral practitioner upon proper application.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 21; 2001, ch. 232, § 7; 2007, ch. 234, § 15; 2017, ch. 92, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.

Cross-References.

Burial-transit permits, see N.D.C.C. §§ 23-06-07 to 23-06-12.

Disinterment, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-21.

23-02.1-22.
Extension of time.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health may, by regulation and upon such conditions as it may prescribe to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter, provide for the extension of the periods of time prescribed in sections 23-02.1-19, 23-02.1-20, and 23-02.1-21 for the filing of death records, fetal death records, medical certification of death, and for the obtaining of final disposition-transit permits in cases in which compliance with the applicable prescribed period would result in undue hardship.

Regulations of the state department of health may provide for the issuance of a final disposition-transit permit under section 23-02.1-21 before the filing of a record of death or fetal death upon conditions designed to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter in cases in which compliance with the requirement that the records be filed before the issuance of the permit would result in undue hardship.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 22; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 16; 2017, ch. 92, § 5, effective August 1, 2017.

23-02.1-22.
Extension of time.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services may, by regulation and upon such conditions as it may prescribe to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter, provide for the extension of the periods of time prescribed in sections 23-02.1-19, 23-02.1-20, and 23-02.1-21 for the filing of death records, fetal death records, medical certification of death, and for the obtaining of final disposition-transit permits in cases in which compliance with the applicable prescribed period would result in undue hardship.

Regulations of the department of health and human services may provide for the issuance of a final disposition-transit permit under section 23-02.1-21 before the filing of a record of death or fetal death upon conditions designed to assure compliance with the purposes of this chapter in cases in which compliance with the requirement that the records be filed before the issuance of the permit would result in undue hardship.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 22; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 16; 2017, ch. 92, § 5, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 155, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-23.
Marriage registration.

A record of each marriage performed in this state must be filed with the state registrar as provided in this section.

The officer who issues the marriage license shall prepare the record on the form prescribed and furnished by the state registrar upon the basis of information obtained from the parties to be married, who shall attest to information by their signatures.

Every person who performs a marriage shall certify the fact of marriage and file the record with the officer who issued the license within seven days after the ceremony.

Every officer issuing a marriage license shall complete and forward to the state registrar, on or before the fifth day of each calendar month, a copy of the marriage records specified in subsection 1 for marriages filed with that officer during the preceding calendar month.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 23; 2007, ch. 234, § 17.

23-02.1-24.
Court reports of divorce and annulment of marriage.

For each divorce and annulment of marriage granted by any court in this state, a report must be prepared and filed by the clerk of court with the state registrar. The information necessary to prepare the report must be furnished, with the petition, to the clerk of court by the parties or their legal representatives on forms prescribed and furnished by the state registrar.

On or before the fifth day of each month, the clerk of court shall forward to the state registrar the report of each divorce and annulment granted during the preceding calendar month and such related reports as may be required by regulations issued under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 24.

Cross-References.

Decree or judgment of divorce or annulment filed with registrar of vital statistics, see N.D.C.C. § 27-05.2-05.

23-02.1-25.
Correction and amendment of vital records.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

A record registered under this chapter may be amended only in accordance with this chapter and regulations under this chapter adopted by the state department of health to protect the integrity and accuracy of vital records.

A record that is amended under this section must be marked “amended” except as provided in subsection 4. The date of amendment and a summary description of the evidence submitted in support of the amendment must be endorsed on or made a part of the record. The state department of health shall prescribe by regulation the conditions under which additions or minor corrections may be made to birth records within one year after the date of birth without the record being considered as amended.

Upon receipt of a certified copy of a court order that is amending a birth, death, or fetal death record and upon request of such individual or the individual’s parent, guardian, or legal representative, the state registrar shall amend the record as directed in the court order; however, if the state registrar has information to believe the facts of the court order are false or inaccurate, the state registrar shall provide the court and any known parties with the correct information.

Upon receipt of a sworn acknowledgment of paternity of a child born out of wedlock signed by both parents and upon request, the state registrar shall amend a record of birth to show such paternity if paternity is not shown on the record. Upon request of the parents, the surname of the child must be changed on the appropriate record to the surname designated by the parents on the acknowledgment of paternity. Such record may not be marked as “amended”. The provisions of this subsection apply also in their entirety to records of fetal death.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 25; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 18; 2015, ch. 188, § 6, effective August 1, 2015.

23-02.1-25.
Correction and amendment of vital records.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

A record registered under this chapter may be amended only in accordance with this chapter and regulations under this chapter adopted by the department of health and human services to protect the integrity and accuracy of vital records.

A record that is amended under this section must be marked “amended” except as provided in subsection 4. The date of amendment and a summary description of the evidence submitted in support of the amendment must be endorsed on or made a part of the record. The department of health and human services shall prescribe by regulation the conditions under which additions or minor corrections may be made to birth records within one year after the date of birth without the record being considered as amended.

Upon receipt of a certified copy of a court order that is amending a birth, death, or fetal death record and upon request of such individual or the individual’s parent, guardian, or legal representative, the state registrar shall amend the record as directed in the court order; however, if the state registrar has information to believe the facts of the court order are false or inaccurate, the state registrar shall provide the court and any known parties with the correct information.

Upon receipt of a sworn acknowledgment of paternity of a child born out of wedlock signed by both parents and upon request, the state registrar shall amend a record of birth to show such paternity if paternity is not shown on the record. Upon request of the parents, the surname of the child must be changed on the appropriate record to the surname designated by the parents on the acknowledgment of paternity. Such record may not be marked as “amended”. The provisions of this subsection apply also in their entirety to records of fetal death.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 25; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2007, ch. 234, § 18; 2015, ch. 188, § 6, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 352, § 156, effective September 1, 2022.

23-02.1-26.
Reproduction of records.

To preserve original documents, the state registrar is authorized to prepare typewritten, photographic, electronic, or other reproductions of original records and files in the state registrar’s office. These reproductions when certified by the state registrar must be accepted as the original record.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 26; 2007, ch. 234, § 19.

23-02.1-27.
Disclosure of records. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Birth, death, and fetal death records, filings, data, or other information related to birth, death, and fetal death records are confidential and may not be disclosed except as authorized under this chapter. The state registrar shall restrict access to all vital records to protect vital records from loss, mutilation, or destruction and to prevent disclosure of the information contained in these records except as authorized under this chapter.

A certified copy of a birth record may be issued to the individual named on the record if that individual is at least sixteen years old, to a parent named on the record, to an authorized representative, or by the order of a court of competent jurisdiction. If the individual named on a birth record is deceased, a certified copy of that record may also be issued to a relative. If the date of birth on any birth record is more than one hundred and twenty-five years old, that record is an open record and a certified copy may be issued to anyone, except that adoption records remain confidential.

A certified copy of a complete death record may be issued to a relative, an authorized representative, the child fatality review board, a licensed physician, or a genetic sibling for the purposes of researching family medical history, a funeral director reporting the facts of death, or a person with personal or real property interests that depend upon information contained in the complete death record or by the order of a court of competent jurisdiction and may include the cause of death and the social security number. A certified copy of the facts of death record that includes the facts of death and the social security number may be issued to any person that may obtain a certified copy of a complete death record or to any licensed attorney who requires the copy for a bona fide legal determination. A certified copy of an informational death record may be issued to the general public, but the copy may not contain the cause of death or the social security number.

A certified copy of a fetal death record may be issued to a parent named on the record, an authorized representative, or by the order of a court of competent jurisdiction. A person authorized to receive a certified copy of a fetal death record may request the certified copy be issued in the form of a certification of birth resulting in stillbirth.

A noncertified informational copy of a marriage record may be issued to the general public.

A person authorized to receive a certified copy of any specific record may grant another person the same authority by completing a written authorization on a form prescribed by the state department of health.

The state department of health may grant limited access to birth and death information to divisions and programs of the state department of health, the department of transportation, the protection and advocacy project, the information technology department, and to the department of human services necessary for the purpose of completing their respective official duties.

The state department of health may issue, through electronic means determined by the state department of health, verifications of information contained on birth or death records filed with the state registrar when such information is provided and a verification is requested by a governmental agency, whether foreign or domestic, in the conduct of the agency’s official duties. The state department of health may also issue these electronic verifications for a negotiated and agreed-upon fee to:

Benefit-paying parties, such as annuity companies, pension plans, and life insurance companies, that demonstrate a need for such information to determine whether the benefits the benefit-paying party are paying should be terminated or distributed to a beneficiary;

Physicians licensed to practice in the United States who demonstrate such information is needed to determine whether a patient the physician is treating has been lost to care;

Attorneys licensed to practice in the United States who demonstrate that the information is necessary to administer the attorneys’ client’s estate; or

Other entities for fraud prevention as determined by the state registrar.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 27; 1993, ch. 249, § 1; 1995, ch. 116, § 5; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2003, ch. 382, § 4; 2007, ch. 234, § 20; 2011, ch. 185, § 2; 2011, ch. 127, § 4; 2015, ch. 188, § 7, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 56, § 4, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 196, § 1, effective April 16, 2021.

Note.

Section 23-02.1-27 was amended 4 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 196, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2123; Section 157 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; Section 158 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; and Section 4 of Chapter 56, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2035.

23-02.1-27.
Disclosure of records. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Birth, death, and fetal death records, filings, data, or other information related to birth, death, and fetal death records are confidential and may not be disclosed except as authorized under this chapter. The state registrar shall restrict access to all vital records to protect vital records from loss, mutilation, or destruction and to prevent disclosure of the information contained in these records except as authorized under this chapter.

A certified copy of a birth record may be issued to the individual named on the record if that individual is at least sixteen years old, to a parent named on the record, to an authorized representative, or by the order of a court of competent jurisdiction. If the individual named on a birth record is deceased, a certified copy of that record may also be issued to a relative. If the date of birth on any birth record is more than one hundred and twenty-five years old, that record is an open record and a certified copy may be issued to anyone, except that adoption records remain confidential.

A certified copy of a complete death record may be issued to a relative, an authorized representative, the child fatality review board, a licensed physician, or a genetic sibling for the purposes of researching family medical history, a funeral director reporting the facts of death, or a person with personal or real property interests that depend upon information contained in the complete death record or by the order of a court of competent jurisdiction and may include the cause of death and the social security number. A certified copy of the facts of death record that includes the facts of death and the social security number may be issued to any person that may obtain a certified copy of a complete death record or to any licensed attorney who requires the copy for a bona fide legal determination. A certified copy of an informational death record may be issued to the general public, but the copy may not contain the cause of death or the social security number.

A certified copy of a fetal death record may be issued to a parent named on the record, an authorized representative, or by the order of a court of competent jurisdiction. A person authorized to receive a certified copy of a fetal death record may request the certified copy be issued in the form of a certification of birth resulting in stillbirth.

A noncertified informational copy of a marriage record may be issued to the general public.

A person authorized to receive a certified copy of any specific record may grant another person the same authority by completing a written authorization on a form prescribed by the state department of health.

The department of health and human services may grant limited access to birth and death information to divisions and programs of the department of health and human services, the department of transportation, the protection and advocacy project, and the information technology department necessary for the purpose of completing their respective official duties.

The department of health and human services may issue, through electronic means determined by the department of health and human services, verifications of information contained on birth or death records filed with the state registrar when such information is provided and a verification is requested by a governmental agency, whether foreign or domestic, in the conduct of the agency’s official duties. The department of health and human services may also issue these electronic verifications for a negotiated and agreed-upon fee to:

Benefit-paying parties, such as annuity companies, pension plans, and life insurance companies, that demonstrate a need for such information to determine whether the benefits the benefit-paying party are paying should be terminated or distributed to a beneficiary;

Physicians licensed to practice in the United States who demonstrate such information is needed to determine whether a patient the physician is treating has been lost to care;

Attorneys licensed to practice in the United States who demonstrate that the information is necessary to administer the attorneys’ client’s estate; or

Other entities for fraud prevention as determined by the state registrar.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 223, § 27; 1993, ch. 249, § 1; 1995, ch. 116, § 5; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2003, ch. 382, § 4; 2007, ch. 234, § 20; 2011, ch. 185, § 2; 2011, ch. 127, § 4; 2015, ch. 188, § 7, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 56, § 4, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 196, § 1, effective April 16, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, §§ 157, 158, effective September 1, 2022.